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DI−268 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C 1251 / 51 HydraulicBrakeBoosterPumpMotor
Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1251 / 51

Either of the following 1. or 2. is detected:
1. After turning the ignition switch ON, the current of more

than 30 A flows to the motor for more than 1 sec.
2. After turning the ignition switch ON, less than 7 A

change in current is detected more than 3 times in a low
when the motor is ON.

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check operation of hydraulic brake booster pump motor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from the hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Connect battery positive  lead to BM1 or BM2 terminal and
battery negative  lead to EM1 or EM2 terminal of the hydraulic
brake booster (pump motor) connector.
OK:

The operation sound of the pump motor should be
heard.

NG Go to step 4.

OK

2 Check hydraulic brake booster resistance.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from the hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Check resistance between terminals MT+ and MT−, BM1 and
MT, BM2 and MTT, EM1 and MT+, EM2 and MT+ of the hydrau-
lic brake booster connector.
OK:

30 − 36 �

NG Replace the hydraulic brake booster assembly.

OK

3 Check for open circuit in harness and connector between hydraulic brake boost-
er (MT+, MT−) and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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Check and replace skid control ECU.

4 Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between hydraulic
brake booster and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Replace wire harness.

OK

5 Check hydraulic brake booster pump motor (See Pub. No. RM793E on page
BR−7).

NG Replace hydraulic brake booster pump motor.

OK

Replace hydraulic brake booster.


